Hawaii statutes.
[§291E-67] Assisting or abetting the
circumvention of, or tampering with, an ignition interlock device; penalties. (a)
No person shall knowingly:

(1) Blow into or start a vehicle equipped with an
ignition interlock device for the purposes of providing an operable vehicle to
another person who has been restricted by law to operating only a vehicle
equipped with an ignition interlock device;

(2) Tamper with an ignition interlock device with the
intent to render it inaccurate or inoperable to permit another person, who has
been restricted by law to operating only a vehicle equipped with an ignition
interlock device, to operate the vehicle; or

(3) Rent, lease, or lend a vehicle to another person
who has been restricted by law to operating only vehicles equipped with an
ignition interlock device, when the rented, leased, or loaned vehicle is not
equipped with a functioning certified ignition interlock device.

(b) Subsection (a) shall not apply to any act
taken for the purpose of safety or mechanical repair of the device; provided
that the person who is restricted to operating a vehicle equipped with the
interlock device does not operate the vehicle.

(c) Any person who violates this section shall
be:

(1) Fined not more than $1,000 or imprisoned not more
than thirty days, or both, for any offense that does not occur within five
years of two prior convictions for this offense; and

(2) Fined not less than $500 but not more than $1,000
or imprisoned not more than one year, or both, if the person has two or more
prior convictions for the offense in the preceding five-year period. [L 2010, c
166, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next